Maryland, session 2025, SB0128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–301.1.
(a) (1) (i) On or after July 1, 1977, a person under 18 years of age may not
procure a hunting license or hunt in the State, unless the person has first been issued a
certificate of competency in firearms and hunter safety.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0128*

SENATE BILL 128
(ii) On or after July 1, 1977, a person, regardless of age, may not
procure a hunting license without producing a certificate of competency or a hunting license
issued before July 1, 1977, or making out an affidavit that the person hunted before July
1, 1977.
(2) (i) This section does not apply to nonresidents of Maryland who
purchase a nonresident 3–day hunting license in the State to hunt wild waterfowl.
(ii) This section applies to nonresidents of Maryland who purchase
hunting licenses in the State to hunt wildlife other than wild waterfowl.
(b) (1) The Department shall prescribe a course of instruction in conservation
and in competency and safety in the handling of firearms.
(2) (i) The Department shall designate those persons or agencies
authorized to give the course of instruction, and this designation shall be valid until
revoked by the Department.
(ii) Those designated persons shall submit to the Department
validated listings naming all persons who have successfully completed the course of
instruction.
(3) (I) The Department shall issue [a certificate of competency and
safety] to each person who successfully completes the course of instruction[, and the
certificate]:
1. A CERTIFICATE OF COMPETENCY AND SAFETY; AND
2. A PERMANENT IDENTIFICATION NUMBER.
(II) A CERTIFICATE OF COMPETENCY AND SAFETY ISSUED
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH shall be valid until revoked by the Department.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRINT THE PERMANENT
IDENTIFICATION NUMBER ASSIGNED TO A PERSON UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH ON:
1. THE CERTIFICATE OF COMPETENCY AND SAFETY
ISSUED TO THE PERSON; OR
2. A SEPARATE FORM PROVIDED WITH THE
CERTIFICATE OF COMPETENCY AND SAFETY.
(4) The Department may not issue a certificate of competency and safety to
an individual under the age of 18 unless the individual has completed satisfactorily the

SENATE BILL 128 3
course of instruction, or produces a certificate of competency or a hunting license issued
prior to July 1, 1978, or makes out an affidavit that the individual had such a license.
(d) The Department shall adopt regulations to provide for the course of
instruction and the issuance of the certificates consistent with the purpose of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.